Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF634.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2456SV (2) 91 as/js S.F. 634 Section 1. Section 692A.110, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. A sex offender shall pay an annual fee in the amount 3 of twenty-five fifty dollars to the sheriff of the county 4 of principal residence, beginning with the first required 5 in-person appearance at the sheriffâs office after July 6 1, 2009. If the sex offender has more than one principal 7 residence in this state, the offender shall pay the annual 8 fee in the county where the offender is first required to 9 appear in person after July 1, 2009. The sheriff shall accept 10 the registration. If, at the time of registration, the sex 11 offender is unable to pay the fee, the sheriff may allow the 12 offender time to pay the fee, permit the payment of the fee in 13 installments, or may waive payment of the fee. Fees paid to 14 the sheriff shall be used to defray the costs of duties related 15 to the registration of sex offenders under this chapter . 16